trunk/apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns-already-added.dix
<pardef n="svan__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dram/a__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ana</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lov__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ar__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="post/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersen</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersarna</l>   <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tango__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bekant__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kasus__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="he-m/an__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>annen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>än</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ännen</l>     <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="roll-on/roll-off-fartyg__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>roll-off-fartyg<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vakuum__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kön__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pumps__n_p">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vers__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gärningsman">     <i>gärningsm</i><par n="he-m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vers">            <i>vers</i><par n="vers__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vakuum">          <i>vakuum</i><par n="vakuum__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="stift">           <i>stift</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="statsman">        <i>statsm</i><par n="he-m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kön">             <i>kön</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="departement">     <i>departement</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="medlemskap">      <i>medlemskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fiskeredskap">    <i>fiskeredskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="snacks">          <i>snacks</i><par n="pumps__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="tack">            <i>tack</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="he-man">          <i>he-m</i><par n="he-m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="landskap">        <i>landskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bekant">          <i>bekant</i><par n="bekant__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="budskap">         <i>budskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="svan">            <i>svan</i><par n="svan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ort">             <i>ort</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="redskap">         <i>redskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kol">             <i>kol</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="pund">            <i>pund</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="tango">           <i>tango</i><par n="tango__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="telefonsamtal">   <i>telefonsamtal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="heltal">          <i>heltal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="avtal">           <i>avtal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="köp-slit-och-släng"><i>köp-slit-och-släng</i><par n="lov__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="avfall">          <i>avfall</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="årtal">           <i>årtal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="försvarstal">     <i>försvarstal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kontor">          <i>kontor</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="språkrör">        <i>språkrör</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="poäng">           <i>poäng</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="kvartal">         <i>kvartal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="talman">          <i>talm</i><par n="he-m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lysrör">          <i>lysrör</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kredit">          <i>kredit</i><par n="lov__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="rollspel">        <i>rollspel</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="samtal">          <i>samtal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="uttal">           <i>uttal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="antal">           <i>antal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ting">            <i>ting</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="temperament">     <i>temperament</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="manskap">         <i>manskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kasus">           <i>kasus</i><par n="kasus__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sockerrör">       <i>sockerrör</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mästerskap">      <i>mästerskap</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="borst">           <i>borst</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="universitet">     <i>universitet</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="medeltal">        <i>medeltal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="åtal">            <i>åtal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dussintal">       <i>dussintal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kronblad">        <i>kronblad</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="roll-on/roll-off-fartyg"><i>roll-on/roll-off-fartyg</i><par n="roll-on/roll-off-fartyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="flygblad">        <i>flygblad</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="mantal">          <i>mantal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="drama">           <i>dram</i><par n="dram/a__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lov">             <i>lov</i><par n="lov__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tangentbord">     <i>tangentbord</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="poster">          <i>post</i><par n="post/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="tiotal">          <i>tiotal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="behov">           <i>behov</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="parlament">       <i>parlament</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ar">              <i>ar</i><par n="ar__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="primtal">         <i>primtal</i><par n="kön__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="polisman">        <i>polism</i><par n="he-m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fransman">        <i>fransm</i><par n="he-m/an__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pumps">           <i>pumps</i><par n="pumps__n_p"/></e>
